Wyoming, session 2025, SF0166.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 22-4-402(a) and (e) is amended to
read:
22-4-402. Petition; form; validity.
(a) Any group of persons desiring to form a new
political party within this state shall file a petition
with the secretary of state not later than June 1 May 1 in
any general election year in which the party seeks to
qualify for the general election ballot.
(e) The petition shall be circulated no earlier than
April 1 March 1 of the year preceding the general election.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0166
ENROLLED ACT NO. 74, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
2